New York, session 2025-2026, A4804.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 138 of the public service law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision 6 to read as follows: 3 6. The uniform standards and conditions established pursuant to this 4 section shall be designed to avoid, minimize, or mitigate to the maximum 5 extent practicable, potential significant adverse impacts to land within 6 the Hudson River watershed area, with additional consideration for land 7 within an agricultural or conservation district or land that contains 8 mineral soil groups 1-4. The provisions of this subdivision shall not 9 apply in the consideration of any permits for siting, design, 10 construction, or operation of a major renewable energy facility for 11 which a completed application has been received by the office of renewa- 12 ble energy siting and electric transmissions prior to the adoption of 13 amended uniform standards and conditions consistent with this subdivi- 14 sion. 15 § 2. Section 144 of the public service law is amended by adding a new 16 subdivision 5 to read as follows: 17 5. ORES and the department shall not deem any site for qualified ener- 18 gy storage systems suitable without first consulting any municipalities 19 with jurisdiction over the potential build-ready site and obtaining such 20 municipalities' approval. 21 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, the 22 amendments to article 8 of the public service law made by sections one 23 and two of this act shall not affect the repeal of such article and 24 shall be deemed repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06468-01-5